Hawaii statutes.
§674-6 Rulemaking powers. The panel
shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 prescribing the procedures to
be followed in the filing of claims and in the proceedings for review of
claims under this chapter, and any other rules as the panel deems necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter. [L 1991, c 323, pt of §1; am L 1993, c
351, §4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next